Tennessee, session 114, SB0657.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-12-203(10), is amended by
adding the following new subdivisions:
(RRR) Organized retail crime under § 39-14-113(c); or
(SSS) Possession or employment of a firearm or antique firearm during the
commission of or attempt to commit a dangerous felony under § 39-17-1324.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-12-203(10)(C), is amended by
deleting "relating to robbery" and substituting "relating to robbery or carjacking".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to any offense committed on or after that date.
SB0657
000968
- 1 -